test/src/morphology/A-punane_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - punane: # Noun 'horse' - full paradigm
     # according to Eesti keele käsiraamat
     # http://www.eki.ee/books/ekk09/
     # -----------------------------------------
     #
     # Singular
     #
     punane+A+Sg+Nom: punane
     punane+A+Sg+Gen: punase
     punane+A+Sg+Par: punast
     punane+A+Sg+Ill: punasesse
     punane+A+Sg+Ine: punases
     punane+A+Sg+Ela: punasest
     punane+A+Sg+All: punasele
     punane+A+Sg+Ade: punasel
     punane+A+Sg+Abl: punaselt
     punane+A+Sg+Tra: punaseks
     punane+A+Sg+Trm: punaseni
     punane+A+Sg+Ess: punasena
     punane+A+Sg+Abe: punaseta
     punane+A+Sg+Com: punasega
     #
     # Plural
     #
     punane+A+Pl+Nom: punased
     punane+A+Pl+Gen: punaste
     punane+A+Pl+Par: punaseid
     punane+A+Pl+Ill: punastesse
     punane+A+Pl+Ine: punastes
     punane+A+Pl+Ela: punastest
     punane+A+Pl+All: punastele
     punane+A+Pl+Ade: punastel
     punane+A+Pl+Abl: punastelt
     punane+A+Pl+Tra: punasteks
     punane+A+Pl+Trm: punasteni
     punane+A+Pl+Ess: punastena
     punane+A+Pl+Abe: punasteta
     punane+A+Pl+Com: punastega   
